test/data/dictyamls/dict-gt-yamls/N-lex_kirkko_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst

Tests:

  Noun - kirkko: #KISSA --
    kirkko+N+Sg+Nom:  kirkko
    kirkko+N+Sg+Gen:  kiˊrho
    kirkko+N+Sg+Acc:  kiˊrho
    kirkko+N+Sg+Ill:  kiirkon
    kirkko+N+Sg+Loc:  kirhoost
    kirkko+N+Sg+Com:  kirhoin
    kirkko+N+Sg+Abe:  kiˊrhottáá
    kirkko+N+Ess:  kirkkon
    kirkko+N+Par:  kirkkod
    kirkko+N+Pl+Nom:  kiˊrhoh
    kirkko+N+Pl+Gen:  kiˊrhoi
    kirkko+N+Pl+Acc:  kirhoid
    kirkko+N+Pl+Ill:  kirhoid
    kirkko+N+Pl+Loc:  kiˊrhoin
    kirkko+N+Pl+Com:  kiˊrhoiguin
    kirkko+N+Pl+Abe:  kiˊrhoittáá
    
  Noun - pargo: # ok PARGO 
    pargo+N+Sg+Nom:  pargo
    pargo+N+Sg+Gen:  paˊrgo
    pargo+N+Sg+Acc:  paˊrgo
    pargo+N+Sg+Ill:  paargon
    pargo+N+Sg+Loc:  pargoost
    pargo+N+Sg+Com:  pargoin
    pargo+N+Sg+Abe:  paˊrgottáá
    pargo+N+Ess:  pargon
    pargo+N+Par:  pargod
    pargo+N+Pl+Nom:  paˊrgoh
    pargo+N+Pl+Gen:  paˊrgoi
    pargo+N+Pl+Acc:  pargoid
    pargo+N+Pl+Ill:  pargoid
    pargo+N+Pl+Loc:  paˊrgoin
    pargo+N+Pl+Com:  paˊrgoiguin
    pargo+N+Pl+Abe:  paˊrgoittáá

  Noun - jasko: # ok PARGO
    jasko+N+Sg+Nom:  jasko
    jasko+N+Sg+Gen:  jaˊsko
    jasko+N+Sg+Acc:  jaˊsko
    jasko+N+Sg+Ill:  jaaskon
    jasko+N+Sg+Loc:  jaskoost
    jasko+N+Sg+Com:  jaskoin
    jasko+N+Sg+Abe:  jaˊskottáá
    jasko+N+Ess:  jaskon
    jasko+N+Par:  jaskod
    jasko+N+Pl+Nom:  jaˊskoh
    jasko+N+Pl+Gen:  jaˊskoi
    jasko+N+Pl+Acc:  jaskoid
    jasko+N+Pl+Ill:  jaskoid
    jasko+N+Pl+Loc:  jaˊskoin
    jasko+N+Pl+Com:  jaˊskoiguin
    jasko+N+Pl+Abe:  jaˊskoittáá
  
  Noun - asto: # ok PARGO
    asto+N+Sg+Nom:  asto
    asto+N+Sg+Gen:  aˊsto
    asto+N+Sg+Acc:  aˊsto
    asto+N+Sg+Ill:  aaston
    asto+N+Sg+Loc:  astoost
    asto+N+Sg+Com:  astoin
    asto+N+Sg+Abe:  aˊstottáá
    asto+N+Ess:  aston
    asto+N+Par:  astod
    asto+N+Pl+Nom:  aˊstoh
    asto+N+Pl+Gen:  aˊstoi
    asto+N+Pl+Acc:  astoid
    asto+N+Pl+Ill:  astoid
    asto+N+Pl+Loc:  aˊstoin
    asto+N+Pl+Com:  aˊstoiguin
    asto+N+Pl+Abe:  aˊstoittáá

  Noun - kerho: # PARGO
    kerho+N+Sg+Nom:  kerho
    kerho+N+Sg+Gen:  keˊrho
    kerho+N+Sg+Acc:  keˊrho
    kerho+N+Sg+Ill:  keerhon
    kerho+N+Sg+Loc:  kerhoost
    kerho+N+Sg+Com:  kerhoin
    kerho+N+Sg+Abe:  keˊrhottáá
    kerho+N+Ess:  kerhon
    kerho+N+Par:  kerhod
    kerho+N+Pl+Nom:  keˊrhoh
    kerho+N+Pl+Gen:  keˊrhoi
    kerho+N+Pl+Acc:  kerhoid
    kerho+N+Pl+Ill:  kerhoid
    kerho+N+Pl+Loc:  keˊrhoin
    kerho+N+Pl+Com:  keˊrhoiguin
    kerho+N+Pl+Abe:  keˊrhoittáá
     
